Arkansas, session 2025, SB615.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 18, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
23-18-111. Nonexport facility — Definition — Rules.
(a) As used in this section, "nonexport facility" means a facility for
the production of electrical energy to meet all or part of a customer's need
for electrical energy within a single electric utility's allocated service
territory that does not intentionally feed electricity back to the electric
utility.
(b)(1) On or before March 1, 2026, following notice, opportunity for
public comment, and a hearing, the Arkansas Public Service Commission shall
promulgate appropriate rules for a nonexport facility.
(2) The rules promulgated under subdivision (b)(1) of this
section shall include without limitation:
(A) Standards for the safe, reliable, and acceptable
operation of a nonexport facility, including:
(i) Thermal, service voltage, power quality, or
network limits associated with inadvertent export events; and
*ANS484*
04-09-2025 15:07:21 ANS484

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 S4/9/25 SB615
(ii) Acceptable methods of export limitation,
including:
(a) Power control systems;
(b) Reverse power protection;
(c) Minimum power protection; and
(d) Any necessary limit on capacity size; and
(B) An expedited review process for:
(i) Evaluating and approving acceptable export
control methods and requirements for a nonexport facility; and
(ii) Interconnection.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-18-603(9), concerning the definition of
"net-metering facility" used under the Arkansas Cost-Shifting Prevention Act
of 2023, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(G) Does not include a nonexport facility as defined in §
23-18-111.

/s/C. Penzo


















04-09-2025 15:07:21 ANS484